src-fst-root.lexc.md
Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  **@U.Cap.Obl@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  **@U.Cap.Opt@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

Flags used to identify parts of speech

# FLAGS USED WITH NUMERALS
cardinal vs ordinal
* @U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@
* @U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@
## number
* @U.DECL-NX.SG@
* @U.DECL-NX.SP@
* @U.DECL-NX.PL@
* @R.DECL-NX.SG@
* @R.DECL-NX.SP@
* @R.DECL-NX.PL@
## case

Orthographical errors? 2021-03-13
* @R.ErrOrth.ON@
* @C.ErrOrth@
* @D.ErrOrth.ON@ earlier undeclared

Pmatch 2021-03-13

Removal
* @C.DECL-NX@
* @C.DECL-CX@
* **@C.NUM-TYPE@** 

# Lexicon Root

* adjectives ;
* adpositions ;
* adverbs ;
* conjunctors ;
* determiners ;
* interjections ;
* nouns ;
* pronouns ;
* propernouns ;
* propernouns-toponyms ;
* quantifiers ;
* verbs ;
* **rus-Cyrl-2-Lat-ProperNouns ;** Derived from urj-Cyrl
* Exceptions ;

NEWWORDS FILES
**A_NEWWORDS ;** adjectives
**ADV_NEWWORDS ;** adverbs
**N_NEWWORDS ;** nouns
**PROP_NEWWORDS ;** proper nouns
**V_NEWWORDS ;** verbs

I INCLUDE SOME SMALL LEXICA HERE
WAITING FOR OWN FILES, OR PERHAPS THEY COULD STAY HERE

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/src/fst/root.lexc)</small>

---
